Utah statutes.
62A-1-110.   Executive director -- Jurisdiction over division and office
directors -- Authority.
(1)  The executive director of the department has administrative jurisdiction
over each division and office directors.  The executive director may make
changes in personnel and service functions in the divisions and offices under
his administrative jurisdiction, and authorize designees to perform
appropriate responsibilities, to effectuate greater efficiency and economy in
the operations of the department.
(2)  The executive director may establish offices and bureaus to perform
functions such as budgeting, planning, data processing, and personnel
administration, to facilitate management of the department.
